Utah statutes.
17-23-3.   Seal.

The county surveyor shall have a seal, to be furnished by the county, the impression of which shall contain the following words: "State of Utah, County Surveyor," together with the name of the county in which the same is to be used.



Amended by Chapter 241, 2001 General Session

